Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AGE WELL AT HOME.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Age Well at Home to establish the Minnesota Age in Place Network. Eligible uses of grant money are providing home modifications and safety renovations at the owner-occupied homes of older low- to moderate-income homeowners. No single modification or renovation project may exceed $20,000. Age Well at Home may also use up to ten percent of the grant money for administrative expenses attributable to establishing, expanding, and maintaining the Minnesota Age in Place Network. new text end